Tennessee, session 114, SB0159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-9-110, is amended by adding the
following new subsection (d):
(d) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, voting equipment and machines
must not transmit or receive a ballot, or otherwise be used to cast a ballot, using the
internet, except as authorized for members of the military and overseas citizens in
accordance with chapter 6, part 5 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0159
000763
- 1 -